Arkansas, session 2025, HB1046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 15, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-15-102. Legislative intent — Blue Envelope Program.
(a) The General Assembly intends to establish a Blue Envelope Program
to ease communication between an individual with autism spectrum disorder and
law enforcement during a motor vehicle-related interaction.
(b)(1) By January 1, 2026, the Department of Finance and
Administration shall develop and make available a specially designed blue
envelope that will hold a driver’s essential documents, including without
limitation a driver’s license, vehicle registration, and contact card.
(2) The blue envelope developed under subsection (b)(2) of this
section shall include communication guidelines on its exterior that are
specifically tailored to assist a law enforcement officer in recognizing and
adapting his or her approach when interacting with a driver with autism
spectrum disorder.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, an individual with autism spectrum
disorder who would like to obtain a blue envelope may request a blue envelope
at his or her local department office.

*CRH023*
11/20/2024 12:57:55 PM CRH023